New Jersey, session 221, S1499.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A correctional police officer acting in the performance of the officers official duties in a State correctional facility shall wear a body worn camera: (1)   when designated by the Department of Corrections as a member of the Special Operations Group; (2)   while in a close custody unit; (3)   while in a housing unit; (4)   when providing mobile security; and (5)   when in contact with a member of the public. b.    For the purposes of this section: Body worn camera means a device worn by a law enforcement officer that makes an electronic audio or video recording of activities that take place during any law enforcement action, excluding a mobile video recording device mounted inside a police vehicle or an electronic recording device worn by a law enforcement officer while acting in an undercover capacity. "Close custody unit" means an area within a correctional facility designated for assigning inmates who are removed from the general population for disciplinary or administrative reasons. "Housing unit" means a cell, dormitory, or other type of sleeping area within a correctional facility. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following enactment.